Utah statutes.
75-7-810.   Collecting trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee, and to redress a breach of trust known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee, unless the terms of the trust provide otherwise.

